District of Columbia statutes.
5-702

Application of amendments to §§ 5-701 and 5-716.

The amendments made by Pub. L. 96-122, § 206(a), to §§ 5-701 and 5-716 shall apply with respect to survivor annuities under this subchapter for survivors of officers or members of the Metropolitan Police force or the Fire Department of the District of Columbia which commence on or after the 1st day of the 1st month which begins after the end of the 90-day period beginning on November 17, 1979.

History

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 206(b)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-608.
1973 Ed., § 4-521.1.